Florida, session 2026, SB208.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 32 33 Section 1.âPresent subsections (22) through (54) of section 34 163.3164, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (23) 35 through (55), respectively, a new subsection (22) is added to 36 that section, and subsection (9) of that section is amended, to 37 read: 38 163.3164âCommunity Planning Act; definitions.âAs used in 39 this act: 40 (9)ââCompatibilityâ means a condition in which land uses or 41 conditions within the same land use category can reasonably 42 coexist in relative proximity to each other in a stable and 43 enduring manner without creating undue adverse impacts on each 44 other. Compatibility requires a reasonable ability to fit within 45 the existing community fabric but does not require uniformity or 46 identical development. Residential land uses are compatible if 47 they fall within the same residential land use category as 48 designed in the local governmentâs comprehensive plan fashion 49 over time such that no use or condition is unduly negatively 50 impacted directly or indirectly by another use or condition. 51 (22)ââInfill residential developmentâ means the development 52 of one or more parcels that are no more than 100 acres in size 53 within a future land use category that allows a residential use 54 and any zoning district that allows a residential use and which 55 parcels are contiguous with residential development on at least 56 50 percent of the parcelsâ boundaries. For purposes of this 57 subsection, the term âcontiguousâ means touching, bordering, or 58 adjoining along a boundary and includes properties that would be 59 contiguous if not separated by a roadway, railroad, canal, or 60 other public easement. 61 Section 2.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) and paragraphs 62 (a) and (b) of subsection (5) of section 163.3202, Florida 63 Statutes, are amended, and subsections (8) and (9) are added to 64 that section, to read: 65 163.3202âLand development regulations.â 66 (2)âLocal land development regulations shall contain 67 specific and detailed provisions necessary or desirable to 68 implement the adopted comprehensive plan and shall at a minimum: 69 (b)âRegulate the use of land and water for those land use 70 categories included in the land use element and ensure the 71 compatibility of adjacent uses and provide for open space. 72 However, the land development regulations may not require the 73 denial of, or condition or delay the approval of, residential 74 development on the basis of a lack of compatibility if the 75 proposed residential use is located adjacent to, or across a 76 public right-of-way from, any existing residential development 77 within the same land use category. 78 (5)(a)âLand development regulations relating to building 79 design elements may not be applied to a single-family or two 80 family dwelling unless: 81 1.âThe dwelling is listed in the National Register of 82 Historic Places, as defined in s. 267.021(5); is located in a 83 National Register Historic District; or is designated as a 84 historic property or located in a historic district, under the 85 terms of a local preservation ordinance; 86 2.âThe regulations are adopted in order to implement the 87 National Flood Insurance Program; 88 3.âThe regulations are adopted pursuant to and in 89 compliance with chapter 553; 90 4.âThe dwelling is located in a community redevelopment 91 area, as defined in s. 163.340(10); 92 5.âThe regulations are required to ensure protection of 93 coastal wildlife in compliance with s. 161.052, s. 161.053, s. 94 161.0531, s. 161.085, s. 161.163, or chapter 373; 95 6.âThe dwelling is located in a planned unit development or 96 master planned community created pursuant to a local ordinance, 97 resolution, or other final action approved by the local 98 governing body before July 1, 2023, provided that such 99 regulations were expressly adopted as part of the approval 100 documents for the planned unit development or master planned 101 community; or 102 7.âThe dwelling is located within the jurisdiction of a 103 local government that has a design review board or an 104 architectural review board created by ordinance before January 105 1, 2020, and such board has continuously existed since that 106 date. A local government may not create, recreate, or expand the 107 jurisdiction of such a board after January 1, 2020, for the 108 purpose of regulating single-family or two-family dwellings. 109 (b)âFor purposes of this subsection, the term: 110 1.ââArchitectural review boardâ means a body established 111 and maintained by a private homeownersâ association, property 112 ownersâ association, or condominium association under chapter 113 718 or chapter 720 which is authorized by recorded covenants or 114 governing documents to review and approve building design 115 elements on private property. The term does not include any 116 board, committee, or panel created or controlled by a local 117 government. 118 2.ââBuilding design elementsâ means the external building 119 color; the type or style of exterior cladding material; the 120 style or material of roof structures or porches; the exterior 121 nonstructural architectural ornamentation; the location or 122 architectural styling of windows or doors; the location or 123 orientation of the garage; the number and type of rooms; and the 124 interior layout of rooms. The term does not include the height, 125 bulk, orientation, or location of a dwelling on a zoning lot; or 126 the use of buffering or screening to minimize potential adverse 127 physical or visual impacts or to protect the privacy of 128 neighbors. 129 3.2.ââPlanned unit developmentâ or âmaster planned 130 communityâ means an area of land that is planned and developed 131 as a single entity or in approved stages with uses and 132 structures substantially related to the character of the entire 133 development, or a self-contained development in which the 134 subdivision and zoning controls are applied to the project as a 135 whole rather than to individual lots. 136 (8)âNotwithstanding any ordinance to the contrary, an 137 application for an infill residential development must be 138 administratively approved without requiring a comprehensive plan 139 amendment, rezoning, variance, or any other public hearing by 140 any board or reviewing body if the proposed infill residential 141 development is consistent with current development standards and 142 the density of the proposed infill residential development is 143 the same as the average density of contiguous properties. A 144 development authorized under this subsection must be treated as 145 a conforming use, notwithstanding the local governmentâs 146 comprehensive plan, future land use designation, or zoning. 147 (9)(a)âLand development regulations may not condition the 148 approval of an application for infill residential development, 149 or any other residential development authorized under this act, 150 on the payment of any fee, charge, or exaction based on a 151 percentage of construction costs, site costs, or project 152 valuation. 153 (b)âAny fee or charge imposed by a local government in 154 connection with the review, processing, or inspection of a 155 residential development application must meet all of the 156 following requirements: 157 1.âMust be limited to the actual cost of the service 158 provided by the local government. 159 2.âMust be clearly itemized and published on the local 160 governmentâs fee schedule. 161 3.âMay not exceed the limits established for building and 162 inspection fees under s. 553.80. 163 (c)âThe approval of a residential development application 164 may not be withheld or delayed because of nonpayment, or 165 conditioned on payment, of a fee or charge imposed in violation 166 of this subsection. 167 Section 3.âParagraph (d) of subsection (2) of section 168 212.055, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 169 212.055âDiscretionary sales surtaxes; legislative intent; 170 authorization and use of proceeds.âIt is the legislative intent 171 that any authorization for imposition of a discretionary sales 172 surtax shall be published in the Florida Statutes as a 173 subsection of this section, irrespective of the duration of the 174 levy. Each enactment shall specify the types of counties 175 authorized to levy; the rate or rates which may be imposed; the 176 maximum length of time the surtax may be imposed, if any; the 177 procedure which must be followed to secure voter approval, if 178 required; the purpose for which the proceeds may be expended; 179 and such other requirements as the Legislature may provide. 180 Taxable transactions and administrative procedures shall be as 181 provided in s. 212.054. 182 (2)âLOCAL GOVERNMENT INFRASTRUCTURE SURTAX.â 183 (d)âThe proceeds of the surtax authorized by this 184 subsection and any accrued interest shall be expended by the 185 school district, within the county and municipalities within the 186 county, or, in the case of a negotiated joint county agreement, 187 within another county, to finance, plan, and construct 188 infrastructure; to acquire any interest in land for public 189 recreation, conservation, or protection of natural resources or 190 to prevent or satisfy private property rights claims resulting 191 from limitations imposed by the designation of an area of 192 critical state concern; to provide loans, grants, or rebates to 193 residential or commercial property owners who make energy 194 efficiency improvements to their residential or commercial 195 property, if a local government ordinance authorizing such use 196 is approved by referendum; or to finance the closure of county 197 owned or municipally owned solid waste landfills that have been 198 closed or are required to be closed by order of the Department 199 of Environmental Protection. Any use of the proceeds or interest 200 for purposes of landfill closure before July 1, 1993, is 201 ratified. The proceeds and any interest may not be used for the 202 operational expenses of infrastructure, except that a county 203 that has a population of fewer than 75,000 and that is required 204 to close a landfill may use the proceeds or interest for long 205 term maintenance costs associated with landfill closure. 206 Counties, as defined in s. 125.011, and charter counties may, in 207 addition, use the proceeds or interest to retire or service 208 indebtedness incurred for bonds issued before July 1, 1987, for 209 infrastructure purposes, and for bonds subsequently issued to 210 refund such bonds. Any use of the proceeds or interest for 211 purposes of retiring or servicing indebtedness incurred for 212 refunding bonds before July 1, 1999, is ratified. 213 1.âFor the purposes of this paragraph, the term 214 âinfrastructureâ means: 215 a.âAny fixed capital expenditure or fixed capital outlay 216 associated with the construction, reconstruction, or improvement 217 of public facilities that have a life expectancy of 5 or more 218 years, any related land acquisition, land improvement, design, 219 and engineering costs, and all other professional and related 220 costs required to bring the public facilities into service. For 221 purposes of this sub-subparagraph, the term âpublic facilitiesâ 222 means facilities as defined in s. 163.3164(42) s. 163.3164(41), 223 s. 163.3221(13), or s. 189.012(5), and includes facilities that 224 are necessary to carry out governmental purposes, including, but 225 not limited to, fire stations, general governmental office 226 buildings, and animal shelters, regardless of whether the 227 facilities are owned by the local taxing authority or another 228 governmental entity. 229 b.âA fire department vehicle, an emergency medical service 230 vehicle, a sheriffâs office vehicle, a police department 231 vehicle, or any other vehicle, and the equipment necessary to 232 outfit the vehicle for its official use or equipment that has a 233 life expectancy of at least 5 years. 234 c.âAny expenditure for the construction, lease, or 235 maintenance of, or provision of utilities or security for, 236 facilities, as defined in s. 29.008. 237 d.âAny fixed capital expenditure or fixed capital outlay 238 associated with the improvement of private facilities that have 239 a life expectancy of 5 or more years and that the owner agrees 240 to make available for use on a temporary basis as needed by a 241 local government as a public emergency shelter or a staging area 242 for emergency response equipment during an emergency officially 243 declared by the state or by the local government under s. 244 252.38. Such improvements are limited to those necessary to 245 comply with current standards for public emergency evacuation 246 shelters. The owner must enter into a written contract with the 247 local government providing the improvement funding to make the 248 private facility available to the public for purposes of 249 emergency shelter at no cost to the local government for a 250 minimum of 10 years after completion of the improvement, with 251 the provision that the obligation will transfer to any 252 subsequent owner until the end of the minimum period. 253 e.âAny land acquisition expenditure for a residential 254 housing project in which at least 30 percent of the units are 255 affordable to individuals or families whose total annual 256 household income does not exceed 120 percent of the area median 257 income adjusted for household size, if the land is owned by a 258 local government or by a special district that enters into a 259 written agreement with the local government to provide such 260 housing. The local government or special district may enter into 261 a ground lease with a public or private person or entity for 262 nominal or other consideration for the construction of the 263 residential housing project on land acquired pursuant to this 264 sub-subparagraph. 265 f.âInstructional technology used solely in a school 266 districtâs classrooms. As used in this sub-subparagraph, the 267 term âinstructional technologyâ means an interactive device that 268 assists a teacher in instructing a class or a group of students 269 and includes the necessary hardware and software to operate the 270 interactive device. The term also includes support systems in 271 which an interactive device may mount and is not required to be 272 affixed to the facilities. 273 2.âFor the purposes of this paragraph, the term âenergy 274 efficiency improvementâ means any energy conservation and 275 efficiency improvement that reduces consumption through 276 conservation or a more efficient use of electricity, natural 277 gas, propane, or other forms of energy on the property, 278 including, but not limited to, air sealing; installation of 279 insulation; installation of energy-efficient heating, cooling, 280 or ventilation systems; installation of solar panels; building 281 modifications to increase the use of daylight or shade; 282 replacement of windows; installation of energy controls or 283 energy recovery systems; installation of electric vehicle 284 charging equipment; installation of systems for natural gas fuel 285 as defined in s. 206.9951; and installation of efficient 286 lighting equipment. 287 3.âNotwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, 288 a local government infrastructure surtax imposed or extended 289 after July 1, 1998, may allocate up to 15 percent of the surtax 290 proceeds for deposit into a trust fund within the countyâs 291 accounts created for the purpose of funding economic development 292 projects having a general public purpose of improving local 293 economies, including the funding of operational costs and 294 incentives related to economic development. The ballot statement 295 must indicate the intention to make an allocation under the 296 authority of this subparagraph. 297 4.âSurtax revenues that are shared with eligible charter 298 schools pursuant to paragraph (c) shall be allocated among such 299 schools based on each schoolâs proportionate share of total 300 school district capital outlay full-time equivalent enrollment 301 as adopted by the education estimating conference established in 302 s. 216.136. Surtax revenues must be expended by the charter 303 school in a manner consistent with the allowable uses provided 304 in s. 1013.62(4). All revenues and expenditures shall be 305 accounted for in a charter schoolâs monthly or quarterly 306 financial statement pursuant to s. 1002.33(9). If a schoolâs 307 charter is not renewed or is terminated and the school is 308 dissolved under the provisions of law under which the school was 309 organized, any unencumbered funds received under this paragraph 310 shall revert to the sponsor. 311 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.